Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5753.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 223. (1) A person who knowingly sells a firearm without complying with section 2 of 1927 PA 372, MCL 28.422, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. (2) A person who knowingly sells a firearm more than 26 inches in length to a person under 18 21 years of age is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. A second or subsequent violation of this subsection is a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this subsection that the person who sold the firearm asked to see and was shown a driver license or identification card issued by a state that identified the purchaser as being 18 21 years of age or older. (3) A seller shall not sell a firearm or ammunition to a person if the seller knows that either of the following circumstances exists: (a) The person is under indictment for a felony. As used in this subdivision, "felony" means a violation of a law of this state, or of another state, or of the United States that is punishable by imprisonment for 4 years or more. (b) The person is prohibited under section 224f from possessing, using, transporting, selling, purchasing, carrying, shipping, receiving, or distributing a firearm. (4) A person who violates subsection (3) is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both. Sec. 234f. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), an individual less than 18 21 years of age shall not possess a firearm in public except under the direct supervision of an individual 18 21 years of age or older. (2) Subsection (1) does not apply to an individual less than 18 21 years of age who possesses a firearm in accordance with part 401 (wildlife conservation) of the natural resources and environmental protection act, Act No. 451 of the Public Acts of 1994, being sections 324.40101 to 324.40119 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, or part 435 (hunting and fishing licensing) of Act No. 451 of the Public Acts of 1994, being sections 324.43501 to 324.43561 of the Michigan Compiled Laws. or part 435 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.40101 to 324.40120 and 324.43501 to 324.43561. However, an individual less than 18 21 years of age may possess a firearm without a hunting license while at, or going to or from, a recognized target range or trap or skeet shooting ground if, while going to or from the range or ground, the firearm is enclosed and securely fastened in a case or locked in the trunk of a motor vehicle. (3) An individual who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor , punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. Sec. 237a. (1) An individual who engages in conduct proscribed under section 224, 224a, 224b, 224c, 224e, 226, 227, 227a, 227f, 234a, 234b, or 234c, or who engages in conduct proscribed under section 223(2) for a second or subsequent time, in a weapon free school zone is guilty of a felony punishable by 1 or more of the following: (a) Imprisonment for not more than the maximum term of imprisonment authorized for the section violated. (b) Community service for not more than 150 hours. (c) A fine of not more than 3 times the maximum fine authorized for the section violated. (2) An individual who engages in conduct proscribed under section 223(1), 224d, 227c, 227d, 231c, 232a(1) or (4), 233, 234, 234e, 234f, 235, 236, or 237, or who engages in conduct proscribed under section 223(2) for the first time, in a weapon free school zone is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by 1 or more of the following: (a) Imprisonment for not more than the maximum term of imprisonment authorized for the section violated or 93 days, whichever is greater. (b) Community service for not more than 100 hours. (c) A fine of not more than $2,000.00 or the maximum fine authorized for the section violated, whichever is greater. (3) Subsections (1) and (2) do not apply to conduct proscribed under a section enumerated in those subsections to the extent that the proscribed conduct is otherwise exempted or authorized under this chapter. (4) Except as provided in subsection (5), an individual who possesses a weapon in a weapon free school zone is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by 1 or more of the following: (a) Imprisonment for not more than 93 days. (b) Community service for not more than 100 hours. (c) A fine of not more than $2,000.00. (5) Subsection (4) does not apply to any of the following: (a) An individual employed by or contracted by a school if the possession of that weapon is to provide security services for the school. (b) A peace officer. (c) An individual licensed by this state or another state to carry a concealed weapon. (d) An individual who possesses a weapon provided by a school or a school's instructor on school property for purposes of providing or receiving instruction in the use of that weapon. (e) An individual who possesses a firearm on school property if that possession is with the permission of the school's principal or an agent of the school designated by the school's principal or the school board. (f) An individual who is 18 21 years of age or older who is not a student at the school and who possesses a firearm on school property while transporting a student to or from the school if any of the following apply: (i) The individual is carrying an antique firearm, completely unloaded, in a wrapper or container in the trunk of a vehicle while en route to or from a hunting or target shooting area or function involving the exhibition, demonstration or sale of antique firearms. (ii) The individual is carrying a firearm unloaded in a wrapper or container in the trunk of the person's individual's vehicle, while in possession of a valid Michigan hunting license or proof of valid membership in an organization having shooting range facilities, and while en route to or from a hunting or target shooting area. (iii) The individual is carrying a firearm unloaded in a wrapper or container in the trunk of the individual's vehicle from the place of purchase to his or her the individual's home or place of business or to a place of repair or back to his or her the individual's home or place of business, or in moving goods from one place of abode or business to another place of abode or business. (iv) The individual is carrying an unloaded firearm in the passenger compartment of a vehicle that does not have a trunk, if the individual is otherwise complying with the requirements of subparagraph (ii) or (iii) and the wrapper or container is not readily accessible to the occupants of the vehicle. (6) As used in this section: (a) "Antique firearm" means either of the following: (i) A firearm not designed or redesigned for using rimfire or conventional center fire ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before 1898, including a matchlock, flintlock, percussion cap, or similar type of ignition system or a replica of such a firearm, whether actually manufactured before or after the year 1898. (ii) A firearm using fixed ammunition manufactured in or before 1898, for which ammunition is no longer manufactured in the United States and is not readily available in the ordinary channels of commercial trade. (b) "School" means a public, private, denominational, or parochial school offering developmental kindergarten, kindergarten, or any grade from 1 through 12. (c) "School property" means a building, playing field, or property used for school purposes to impart instruction to children or used for functions and events sponsored by a school, except a building used primarily for adult education or college extension courses. (d) "Weapon" includes, but is not limited to, a pneumatic gun. (e) "Weapon free school zone" means school property and a vehicle used by a school to transport students to or from school property.